Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 8. Snowmobiles

Cross references. —

As to registration of snowmobiles, see §

31-2-401

et seq.

§ 31-5-801.
Operation on highways.

Snowmobiles may be operated upon the highways of Wyoming subject to the following conditions:

Snowmobiles may be operated within the right-of-way but not on the main traveled roadway except as provided hereafter;

Crossings of main-traveled roadways shall be made at right angles to the roadway or as nearly so as practicable, but in any case yielding the right-of-way to all traffic in the main-traveled roadway;

Snowmobiles may be operated on the highways within the cities and towns pursuant to ordinance;

Snowmobiles may be operated on the main-traveled roadway when the highway is closed to wheeled vehicular traffic or subject to approval of the state highway department, upon a designated and posted portion of a state roadway within the boundaries of a national park;

If allowed by the county commissioners, snowmobiles may be operated on a designated and posted portion of a county roadway.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 194, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-169.1; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1989, ch. 84, § 1; 1991, ch. 57, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applicability of rules of the road. —

Plainly, the legislature considered snowmobiles as vehicles for the purposes of Chapter Five and its articles, including Article Two, as can be ascertained by the legislature's inclusion of snowmobiles in Chapter Five's definitions and the specific reference to snowmobiles in Article Eight. Roberts v. Estate of Randall, 2002 WY 115, 51 P.3d 204,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2002).

Applied

in

Daily v. Bone, 906 P.2d 1039,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 1995).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Accidents involving negligence in operation of snowmobile, skimobile or similar vehicle, 42 ALR3d 1422.

Criminal liability based on violation of statute or ordinance specifically regulating operation of snowmobile, 45 ALR3d 1438.

Snowmobile operation as DWI or DUI, 56 ALR4th 1092.

Operation of mopeds and motorized recreational two-, three- and four-wheeled vehicles as within scope of driving while intoxicated statutes, 32 ALR5th 659.